North Carolina, session 2025, HB1128.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 103-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 103-6. Arbor Week.
The week in March November of each year containing March November 15 is hereby
designated as Arbor Week in North Carolina."
SECTION 2. The sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) from the General Fund is
appropriated to the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to produce education and training materials for
Arbor Day celebrations in North Carolina during Arbor Week.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H1128-v-1*